Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB441.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(6) and (7) of the act of June 23, 1982 (P.L.597, No.170), known as the Wild Resource Conservation Act, are amended to read:Section 2. Legislative finding; declaration of policy.It is hereby determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding that there are numerous flora and fauna, including those rare or endangered, which are not commonly 1234567891011121314151617181920 pursued, killed or consumed either for sport or profit, that such species are in need of more active management and that it is in the public interest to preserve and enhance such species for the benefit of all. Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to:* * *(6) Conserve and protect wild plant species and wild native terrestrial invertebrates recognized as endangered, threatened or vulnerable.(7) Conduct an investigation to determine the status of wild plants and wild native terrestrial invertebrates, classify wild plants and wild native terrestrial invertebrates indigenous to or found in the Commonwealth and provide for their protection.* * *Section 2. The definition of "wild resource" in section 3 of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Wild native terrestrial invertebrate." A naturally occurring native nonaquatic, land-dwelling animal lacking a backbone.* * *"Wild resource." All fauna, including native terrestrial invertebrates, not commonly pursued, killed or consumed either for sport or profit, but not including any domestic fauna or any 20250HB0441PN0410 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 domestic fauna that has reverted to a feral existence, and all flora not commonly considered an agricultural commodity.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 7.1. Wild native terrestrial invertebrate management.(a) In addition to the powers and duties granted to it by the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the "Conservation and Natural Resources Act," the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall, with cooperation from taxonomists, biologists , academia, nonprofit organizations and other interested persons, have the following duties: (1) Conduct investigations on wild native terrestrial invertebrates in order to ascertain information relating to population, distribution, habitat needs, limiting factors and other biological and ecological data to classify terrestrial invertebrates and to determine management measures necessary for their continued ability to sustain themselves successfully.(2) Coordinate with Federal and State agencies for successful wild native terrestrial invertebrate conservation.(3) Develop practices and guidance for reducing and mitigating risks to invertebrate biodiversity.(b) The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall establish a classification procedure that should include, but may not be limited to, the following categories:(1) Endangered. Species in danger of extinction throughout all or most of its range if critical habitat is not maintained or is greatly exploited by man.(2) Threatened. Species likely to become endangered throughout all or most of its range if critical habitat is not maintained or is greatly exploited by man.20250HB0441PN0410 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) On the basis of such determinations, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources shall issue regulations not later than two years from the effective date of this subsection, after public notice, after receiving data from interested persons and after holding public hearings. The regulations shall set limitations related to the taking, possessing, transporting, exporting, processing, selling or offering for sale or shipment as may be deemed necessary to manage wild native terrestrial invertebrates.(d) Upon the issuance of the final regulations under subsection (c), the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources may create a list of endangered and threatened species. The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources may add or delete species from the list under this subsection as conditions change and may amend the final regulations under subsection (c) to reflect the changing environment in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0441PN0410 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718